Maine, session 132, LD2018.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §850-H, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA,
§7, is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
A. If the private plan is in the form of self-insurance:
(1) The employer must furnish a bond to the State with a surety company
authorized to transact business in the State, in the form, amount and manner
required by the department;
(2) The department may not allow the pooling of risk among multiple employers;
and
(3) The department shall allow multiple employers to share the cost of legal,
accounting and 3rd-party administrator expenses as long as the arrangements do
not result in pooling of risk;
Sec. 2. 26 MRSA §850-H, sub-§3, ¶E, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA,
§7, is amended to read:
E. Failure to submit reports or comply with other requirements as required by the
commissioner by rule; or
Sec. 3. 26 MRSA §850-H, sub-§3, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA,
§7, is amended to read:
F. Failure to comply with this subchapter or the rules adopted pursuant to this
subchapter.; or
Sec. 4. 26 MRSA §850-H, sub-§3, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. In the case of a private plan in the form of self-insurance, the pooling of risk among
multiple employers.
Sec. 5. Retroactivity. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 1, section
302, this Act applies retroactively to April 1, 2025.
Page 1 - 132LR2791(04)